ro-RO: Suprafață care poate fi vopsită: Grunduit; Gata de vopsit; Necesită șlefuire/pregătire; Sigilat; Nesigilat/Brut; Altele
hr-HR: Površina koja se može bojati: Premazano temeljnom bojom; Spremno za bojenje; Zahtijeva brušenje/pripremu; Zapečaćeno; Nezapečaćeno/sirovo; Ostalo
tr: Boyanabilir yüzey: Astarlanmış; Boyanmaya hazır; Zımparalama/hazırlık gerektirir; Mühürlenmiş; Mühürlenmemiş/Ham; Diğer
ja: ペイント可能な表面: 下塗り済み; 塗装準備完了; サンディング/下準備が必要; シール済み; 未シール/未加工; その他
sl-SI: Površina primerna za barvanje: Z osnovnim premazom; Pripravljeno na barvanje; Potrebno je brušenje/priprava; Zatesnjeno; Nezatesnjeno/surovo; Drugo
cs: Přetíratelný povrch: Základní nátěr; Připraveno k nátěru; Vyžaduje broušení/přípravu; Uzavřeno; Neuzavřeno/surové; Jiné
th: พื้นผิวที่สามารถทาสีได้: ลงสีรองพื้น; พร้อมทาสี; ต้องขัด/เตรียมพื้นผิว; เคลือบเงา; ยังไม่เคลือบ/ดิบ; อื่นๆ
es: Superficie apta para pintar: Imprimado; Listo para pintar; Requiere lijado/preparación; Sellado; Sin sellar/en crudo; Otro
it: Superficie verniciabile: Con primer; Pronto da dipingere; Richiede levigatura/preparazione; Sigillato; Non sigillato/grezzo; Altro
ko: 도색 가능한 표면: 프라이머 처리됨; 페인팅 준비 완료; 샌딩/사전 작업 필요; 밀봉 처리됨; 밀봉 안 됨/로우(Raw); 기타
bg-BG: Боядисваща се повърхност: Грундирана; Готова за боядисване; Изисква шлайфане/подготовка; Запечатана; Незапечатана/сурова; Друго
fi: Maalattava pinta: Pohjamaalattu; Maalausvalmis; Vaatii hiontaa/esivalmistelua; Käsitelty; Käsittelemätön / raaka; Muu
pt-BR: Superfície pintável: Com primer; Pronto para pintar; Exige lixamento/preparação; Selado; Não selado/cru; Outro
en: Paintable surface: Primed; Ready-to-paint; Requires sanding/prep; Sealed; Unsealed/Raw; Other
sk-SK: Povrch vhodný na nanášanie náterov: S podkladovým náterom; Pripravené na maľovanie; Vyžaduje brúsenie/prípravu; S povrchovou úpravou; Bez povrchovej úpravy/surové; Iné
sv: Målningsbar yta: Grundad; Redo att målas; Kräver slipning/förberedelse; Förseglad; Obehandlad/rå; Övrigt
lt-LT: Dažomasis paviršius: Gruntuota; Paruošta dažyti; Reikia šlifuoti / paruošti; Sandarinta; Nesandarinta / neapdorota; Kita
hu: Festhető felület: Alapozott; Festésre kész; Csiszolást/előkészítést igényel; Impregnált; Nem kezelt/Nyers; Egyéb
nb: Malbar overflate: Grunnet; Klar til å males; Krever pussing/forberedelse; Forseglet; Uforseglet/rå; Annet
vi: Bề mặt có thể sơn: Đã sơn lót; Sẵn sàng sơn; Cần chà nhám/chuẩn bị; Đã phủ bóng; Chưa phủ bóng/Thô; Khác
el: Βαφόμενη επιφάνεια: Με αστάρι; Έτοιμο για βάψιμο; Απαιτεί τρίψιμο/προετοιμασία; Σφραγισμένο; Μη σφραγισμένο/Ακατέργαστο; Άλλο
pl: Powierzchnia do malowania: Zaguntowana; Gotowa do malowania; Wymaga szlifowania/przygotowania; Uszczelniona; Nieuszczelniona/Surowa; Inne
da: Malbar overflade: Grundmalet; Malingsklar; Kræver slibning/forberedelse; Forseglet; Uforseglet/rå; Andet
zh-CN: 可涂漆表面: 已涂底漆; 可直接涂漆; 需打磨/准备; 已封闭; 未封闭/原木; 其他
ru: Поверхность под покраску: Грунтованная; Готовая к покраске; Требует шлифовки/подготовки; Защищенная; Без покрытия/необработанная; Другое
nl: Overschilderbaar oppervlak: Gegrond; Schilderklaar; Vereist schuren/voorbereiding; Geseald; Ongeseald/onbehandeld; Overig
fr: Surface peignable: Apprêté; Prêt à peindre; Nécessite un ponçage/une préparation; Scellé; Non scellé/brut; Autre
zh-TW: 可上色表面: 已打底; 可直接上色; 需要打磨/準備; 已封層; 未封層/未加工; 其他
de: Überstreichbare Oberfläche: Grundiert; Malfertig; Erfordert Schleifen/Vorbereitung; Versiegelt; Unversiegelt/Roh; Sonstige
pt-PT: Superfície pintável: Com primário; Pronto a pintar; Requer lixagem/preparação; Selado; Não selado/bruto; Outro